Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.150

Clerk's duty on receipt of execution proceeds.

Upon receipt of proceeds from the sheriff on execution, the clerk shall notify the party to whom the same is payable, and pay over the amount to that party as required by law. If any proceeds remain after satisfaction of the judgment, the clerk shall pay the excess to all interests in, or liens against, the property eliminated by the sale in the order of priority that the interest, lien, or claim attached to the property, as determined by the court. Any remaining proceeds shall be paid to the judgment debtor.

[ 2014 c 107 s 4; 1987 c 442 s 415.]